Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 5. WORKERS' COMPENSATION

SUBTITLE A. TEXAS WORKERS' COMPENSATION ACT

CHAPTER 409. COMPENSATION PROCEDURES

SUBCHAPTER A. INJURY REPORTS, CLAIMS, AND RECORDS

Sec. 409.001. NOTICE OF INJURY TO EMPLOYER. (a) An employee or a person acting on the employee's behalf shall notify the employer of the employee of an injury not later than the 30th day after the date on which:

(1) the injury occurs; or

(2) if the injury is an occupational disease, the employee knew or should have known that the injury may be related to the employment.

(b) The notice required under Subsection (a) may be given to:

(1) the employer; or

(2) an employee of the employer who holds a supervisory or management position.

(c) If the injury is an occupational disease, for purposes of this section, the employer is the person who employed the employee on the date of last injurious exposure to the hazards of the disease.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 409.002. FAILURE TO FILE NOTICE OF INJURY. Failure to notify an employer as required by Section 409.001(a) relieves the employer and the employer's insurance carrier of liability under this subtitle unless:

(1) the employer, a person eligible to receive notice under Section 409.001(b), or the employer's insurance carrier has actual knowledge of the employee's injury;

(2) the division determines that good cause exists for failure to provide notice in a timely manner; or

(3) the employer or the employer's insurance carrier does not contest the claim.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.134, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.003. CLAIM FOR COMPENSATION. An employee or a person acting on the employee's behalf shall file with the division a claim for compensation for an injury not later than one year after the date on which:

(1) the injury occurred; or

(2) if the injury is an occupational disease, the employee knew or should have known that the disease was related to the employee's employment.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.135, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.004. EFFECT OF FAILURE TO FILE CLAIM FOR COMPENSATION. Failure to file a claim for compensation with the division as required under Section 409.003 relieves the employer and the employer's insurance carrier of liability under this subtitle unless:

(1) good cause exists for failure to file a claim in a timely manner; or

(2) the employer or the employer's insurance carrier does not contest the claim.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.136, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.005. REPORT OF INJURY; MODIFIED DUTY PROGRAM NOTICE; ADMINISTRATIVE VIOLATION. (a) An employer shall report to the employer's insurance carrier if:

(1) an injury results in the absence of an employee of that employer from work for more than one day; or

(2) an employee of the employer notifies that employer of an occupational disease under Section 409.001.

(b) The report under Subsection (a) must be made not later than the eighth day after:

(1) the employee's absence from work for more than one day due to an injury; or

(2) the day on which the employer receives notice under Section 409.001 that the employee has contracted an occupational disease.

(c) The employer shall deliver a written copy of the report under Subsection (a) to the injured employee at the time that the report is made to the insurance carrier.

(d) The insurance carrier shall file the report of the injury on behalf of the policyholder. Except as provided by Subsection (e), the insurance carrier must electronically file the report with the division not later than the seventh day after the date on which the carrier receives the report from the employer.

(e) The commissioner may waive the electronic filing requirement under Subsection (d) and allow an insurance carrier to mail or deliver the report to the division not later than the seventh day after the date on which the carrier receives the report from the employer.

(f) A report required under this section may not be considered to be an admission by or evidence against an employer or an insurance carrier in a proceeding before the division or a court in which the facts set out in the report are contradicted by the employer or insurance carrier.

(g) In addition to any information required under Subsection (h), the report provided to the injured employee under Subsection (c) must contain a summary written in plain language of the employee's statutory rights and responsibilities under this subtitle.

(h) The commissioner may adopt rules relating to:

(1) the information that must be contained in a report required under this section, including the summary of rights and responsibilities required under Subsection (g); and

(2) the development and implementation of an electronic filing system for injury reports under this section.

(i) An employer and insurance carrier shall file subsequent reports as required by commissioner rule.

(j) The employer shall, on the written request of the employee, a doctor, the insurance carrier, or the division, notify the employee, the employee's treating doctor if known to the employer, and the insurance carrier of the existence or absence of opportunities for modified duty or a modified duty return-to-work program available through the employer. If those opportunities or that program exists, the employer shall identify the employer's contact person and provide other information to assist the doctor, the employee, and the insurance carrier to assess modified duty or return-to-work options.

(k) This section does not prohibit the commissioner from imposing requirements relating to return-to-work under other authority granted to the division in this subtitle.

(l) A person commits an administrative violation if the person fails to comply with this section unless good cause exists.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 980, Sec. 1.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1456, Sec. 3.01, eff. June 17, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.137, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.006. RECORD OF INJURIES; ADMINISTRATIVE VIOLATION. (a) An employer shall maintain a record of each employee injury as reported by an employee or otherwise made known to the employer.

(b) The record shall be available to the division at reasonable times and under conditions prescribed by the commissioner.

(c) The commissioner may adopt rules relating to the information that must be contained in an employer record under this section.

(d) Information contained in a record maintained under this section is not an admission by the employer that:

(1) the injury did in fact occur; or

(2) a fact maintained in the record is true.

(e) A person commits an administrative violation if the person fails to comply with this section.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.138, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.007. DEATH BENEFIT CLAIMS. (a) A person must file a claim for death benefits with the division or insurance carrier not later than the first anniversary of the date of the employee's death.

(b) Failure to file in the time required by Subsection (a) bars the claim unless:

(1) the person is a minor or incompetent; or

(2) good cause exists for the failure to file a claim under this section.

(c) A separate claim must be filed for each legal beneficiary unless the claim expressly includes or is made on behalf of another person.

(d) If a person files a claim for death benefits with an insurance carrier, at the time the carrier receives the claim the carrier shall, in the form and manner prescribed by the division:

(1) create and maintain a record documenting receipt of the claim; and

(2) provide written notice to the division that the person filed the claim.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.139, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 502 (H.B. 2314), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 409.008. FAILURE TO FILE EMPLOYER REPORT OF INJURY; LIMITATIONS TOLLED. If an employer or the employer's insurance carrier has been given notice or has knowledge of an injury to or the death of an employee and the employer or insurance carrier fails, neglects, or refuses to file the report under Section 409.005, the period for filing a claim for compensation under Sections 409.003 and 409.007 does not begin to run against the claim of an injured employee or a legal beneficiary until the day on which the report required under Section 409.005 has been furnished.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 409.009. SUBCLAIMS. A person may file a written claim with the division as a subclaimant if the person has:

(1) provided compensation, including health care provided by a health care insurer, directly or indirectly, to or for an employee or legal beneficiary; and

(2) sought and been refused reimbursement from the insurance carrier.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.140, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.0091. REIMBURSEMENT PROCEDURES FOR CERTAIN ENTITIES. (a) In this section, "health care insurer" means an insurance carrier and an authorized representative of an insurance carrier, as described by Section 402.084(c-1).

(b) This section applies only to a request for reimbursement by a health care insurer.

(c) Health care paid by a health care insurer may be reimbursable as a medical benefit.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (e), this section does not prohibit or limit a substantive defense by a workers' compensation insurance carrier that the health care paid for by the health care insurer was not a medical benefit or not a correct payment. A subclaimant may not be reimbursed for payment for any health care that was previously denied by a workers' compensation insurance carrier under:

(1) a preauthorization review of the specific service or medical procedure; or

(2) a medical necessity review that determined the service was not medically necessary for the treatment of a compensable injury.

(e) It is not a defense to a subclaim by a health care insurer that:

(1) the subclaimant has not sought reimbursement from a health care provider or the subclaimant's insured;

(2) the subclaimant or the health care provider did not request preauthorization under Section 413.014 or rules adopted under that section; or

(3) the health care provider did not bill the workers' compensation insurance carrier, as provided by Section 408.027, before the 95th day after the date the health care for which the subclaimant paid was provided.

(f) Subject to the time limits under Subsection (n), the health care insurer shall provide, with any reimbursement request, the tax identification number of the health care insurer and the following to the workers' compensation insurance carrier, in a form prescribed by the division:

(1) information identifying the workers' compensation case, including:

(A) the division claim number;

(B) the name of the patient or claimant;

(C) the social security number of the patient or claimant; and

(D) the date of the injury; and

(2) information describing the health care paid by the health care insurer, including:

(A) the name of the health care provider;

(B) the tax identification number of the health care provider;

(C) the date of service;

(D) the place of service;

(E) the ICD-9 code;

(F) the CPT, HCPCS, NDC, or revenue code;

(G) the amount charged by the health care provider; and

(H) the amount paid by the health care insurer.

(g) The workers' compensation insurance carrier shall reduce the amount of the reimbursable subclaim by any payments the workers' compensation insurance carrier previously made to the same health care provider for the provision of the same health care on the same dates of service. In making such a reduction in reimbursement to the subclaimant, the workers' compensation insurance carrier shall provide evidence of the previous payments made to the provider.

(h) For each medical benefit paid, the workers' compensation insurance carrier shall pay to the health care insurer the lesser of the amount payable under the applicable fee guideline as of the date of service or the actual amount paid by the health care insurer. In the absence of a fee guideline for a specific service paid, the amount per service paid by the health care insurer shall be considered in determining a fair and reasonable payment under rules under this subtitle defining fair and reasonable medical reimbursement. The health care insurer may not recover interest as a part of the subclaim.

(i) On receipt of a request for reimbursement under this section, the workers' compensation insurance carrier shall respond to the request in writing not later than the 90th day after the date on which the request is received. If additional information is requested under Subsection (j), the workers' compensation insurance carrier shall respond not later than the 120th day unless the time is extended under Subsection (j).

(j) If the workers' compensation insurance carrier requires additional information from the health care insurer, the workers' compensation insurance carrier shall send notice to the health care insurer requesting the additional information. The health care insurer shall have 30 days to provide the requested information. The workers' compensation insurance carrier and the health care insurer may establish additional periods for compliance with this subsection by written mutual agreement.

(k) Unless the parties have agreed to an extension of time under Subsection (j), the health care insurer must file a written subclaim under this section not later than the 120th day after:

(1) the workers' compensation insurance carrier fails to respond to a request for reimbursement; or

(2) receipt of the workers' compensation insurance carrier's notice of denial to pay or reduction in reimbursement.

(l) Any dispute that arises from a failure to respond to or a reduction or denial of a request for reimbursement of services that form the basis of the subclaim must go through the appropriate dispute resolution process under this subtitle and division rules. The commissioner of insurance and the commissioner of workers' compensation shall modify rules under this subtitle as necessary to allow the health care insurer access as a subclaimant to the appropriate dispute resolution process. Rules adopted or amended by the commissioner of insurance and the commissioner of workers' compensation must recognize the status of a subclaimant as a party to the dispute. Rules modified or adopted under this section should ensure that the workers' compensation insurance carrier is not penalized, including not being held responsible for costs of obtaining the additional information, if the workers' compensation insurance carrier denies payment in order to move to dispute resolution to obtain additional information to process the request.

(m) In a dispute filed under Chapter 410 that arises from a subclaim under this section, an administrative law judge may issue an order regarding compensability or eligibility for benefits and order the workers' compensation insurance carrier to reimburse health care services paid by the health care insurer as appropriate under this subtitle. Any dispute over the amount of medical benefits owed under this section, including medical necessity issues, shall be determined by medical dispute resolution under Sections 413.031 and 413.032.

(n) Except as provided by Subsection (s), a health care insurer must file a request for reimbursement with the workers' compensation insurance carrier not later than six months after the date on which the health care insurer received information under Section 402.084(c-3) and not later than 18 months after the health care insurer paid for the health care service.

(o) The commissioner and the commissioner of insurance shall amend or adopt rules to specify the process by which an employee who has paid for health care services described by Section 408.027(d) may seek reimbursement.

(p) Until September 1, 2011, a workers' compensation insurance carrier is exempt from any department and division data reporting requirements affected by a lack of information caused by reimbursement requests or subclaims under this section. If data reporting is required after that date, the requirement is prospective only and may not require any data to be reported between September 1, 2007, and the date required reporting is reinstated. The department and the division may make legislative recommendations to the 82nd Legislature for the collection of reimbursement request and subclaim data.

(q) An action or failure to act by a workers' compensation insurance carrier under this section may not serve as the basis for an examination or administrative action by the department or the division, or for any cause of action by any person, except for judicial review under this subtitle.

(r) The commissioner of insurance and the commissioner of workers' compensation may adopt additional rules to clarify the processes required by, fulfill the purpose of, or assist the parties in the proper adjudication of subclaims under this section.

(s) On or after September 1, 2007, from information provided to a health care insurer before January 1, 2007, under Section 402.084(c-3), the health care insurer may file not later than March 1, 2008:

(1) a subclaim with the division under Subsection (l) if a request for reimbursement has been presented and denied by a workers' compensation insurance carrier; or

(2) a request for reimbursement under Subsection (f) if a request for reimbursement has not previously been presented and denied by the workers' compensation insurance carrier.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1007 (H.B. 724), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 839 (H.B. 2111), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 409.010. INFORMATION PROVIDED TO EMPLOYEE OR LEGAL BENEFICIARY. Immediately on receiving notice of an injury or death from any person, the division shall send to the employee or legal beneficiary a clear and concise description of:

(1) the services provided by:

(A) the division; and

(B) the office of injured employee counsel, including the services of the ombudsman program;

(2) the division's procedures; and

(3) the person's rights and responsibilities under this subtitle.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.141, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 7, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 409.011. INFORMATION PROVIDED TO EMPLOYER; EMPLOYER'S RIGHTS. (a) Immediately on receiving notice of an injury or death from any person, the division shall send to the employer a description of:

(1) the services provided by the division and the office of injured employee counsel;

(2) the division's procedures; and

(3) the employer's rights and responsibilities under this subtitle.

(b) The information must include a clear statement of the following rights of the employer:

(1) the right to be present at all administrative proceedings relating to an employee's claim;

(2) the right to present relevant evidence relating to an employee's claim at any proceeding;

(3) the right to report suspected fraud;

(4) the right to contest the compensability of an injury if the insurance carrier accepts liability for the payment of benefits;

(5) the right to receive notice, after making a written request to the insurance carrier, of:

(A) a proposal to settle a claim; or

(B) an administrative or a judicial proceeding relating to the resolution of a claim; and

(6) the right to contest the failure of the insurance carrier to provide accident prevention services under Subchapter E, Chapter 411.

(c) The division is not required to provide the information to an employer more than once during a calendar year.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.142, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 8, eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 409.012. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION INFORMATION. (a) The division shall analyze each report of injury received from an employer under this chapter to determine whether the injured employee would be assisted by vocational rehabilitation.

(b) If the division determines that an injured employee would be assisted by vocational rehabilitation, the division shall notify:

(1) the injured employee in writing of the services and facilities available through the Texas Workforce Commission and private providers of vocational rehabilitation; and

(2) the Texas Workforce Commission that the injured employee has been identified as one who could be assisted by vocational rehabilitation.

(c) The division shall cooperate with the office of injured employee counsel, the Texas Workforce Commission, and private providers of vocational rehabilitation in the provision of services and facilities to employees by the Texas Workforce Commission.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 11(6), eff. June 9, 2017.

(e) The commissioner by rule may require that a private provider of vocational rehabilitation services maintain certain credentials and qualifications in order to provide services in connection with a workers' compensation insurance claim.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(127), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 956, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.143, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(127), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 9, eff. June 9, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 11(6), eff. June 9, 2017.

Sec. 409.013. PLAIN LANGUAGE INFORMATION; NOTIFICATION OF INJURED EMPLOYEE. (a) The division shall develop information for public dissemination about the benefit process and the compensation procedures established under this chapter. The information must be written in plain language and must be available in English and Spanish.

(b) On receipt of a report under Section 409.005, the division shall:

(1) contact the affected employee; and

(2) provide the information required under Subsection (a) to that employee, together with any other information that may be prepared by the office of injured employee counsel or the division for public dissemination that relates to the employee's situation, such as information relating to back injuries or occupational diseases.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 980, Sec. 1.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.144, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 2112), Sec. 10, eff. June 9, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. PAYMENT OF BENEFITS

Sec. 409.021. INITIATION OF BENEFITS; INSURANCE CARRIER'S REFUSAL; ADMINISTRATIVE VIOLATION. (a) An insurance carrier shall initiate compensation under this subtitle promptly. Not later than the 15th day after the date on which an insurance carrier receives written notice of an injury, the insurance carrier shall:

(1) begin the payment of benefits as required by this subtitle; or

(2) notify the division and the employee in writing of its refusal to pay and advise the employee of:

(A) the right to request a benefit review conference; and

(B) the means to obtain additional information from the division.

(a-1) An insurance carrier that fails to comply with Subsection (a) does not waive the carrier's right to contest the compensability of the injury as provided by Subsection (c) but commits an administrative violation subject to Subsection (e).

(a-2) An insurance carrier is not required to comply with Subsection (a) if the insurance carrier has accepted the claim as a compensable injury and income or death benefits have not yet accrued but will be paid by the insurance carrier when the benefits accrue and are due.

(a-3) An insurance carrier is not required to comply with Subsection (a) if the claim results from an employee's disability or death for which a presumption is claimed to be applicable under Subchapter B, Chapter 607, Government Code, and, not later than the 15th day after the date on which the insurance carrier received written notice of the injury, the insurance carrier has provided the employee and the division with a notice that describes all steps taken by the insurance carrier to investigate the injury before the notice was given and the evidence the carrier reasonably believes is necessary to complete its investigation of the compensability of the injury. The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this subsection.

(b) An insurance carrier shall notify the division in writing of the initiation of income or death benefit payments in the manner prescribed by commissioner rules.

(c) If an insurance carrier does not contest the compensability of an injury on or before the 60th day after the date on which the insurance carrier is notified of the injury, the insurance carrier waives its right to contest compensability. The initiation of payments by an insurance carrier does not affect the right of the insurance carrier to continue to investigate or deny the compensability of an injury during the 60-day period.

(d) An insurance carrier may reopen the issue of the compensability of an injury if there is a finding of evidence that could not reasonably have been discovered earlier.

(e) An insurance carrier commits an administrative violation if the insurance carrier does not initiate payments or file a notice of refusal as required by this section.

Text of subsec. (f) as added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 939, Sec. 1

(f) For purposes of this section, "written notice" to a certified self-insurer occurs only on written notice to the qualified claims servicing contractor designated by the certified self-insurer under Section 407.061(c).

Text of subsec. (f) as added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1100, Sec. 1

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) a certified self-insurer receives notice on the date the qualified claims servicing contractor designated by the certified self-insurer under Section 407.061(c) receives notice; and

(2) a political subdivision that self-insures under Section 504.011, either individually or through an interlocal agreement with other political subdivisions, receives notice on the date the intergovernmental risk pool or other entity responsible for administering the claim for the political subdivision receives notice.

(j) Each insurance carrier shall establish a single point of contact in the carrier's office for an injured employee for whom the carrier receives a notice of injury.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 939, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1100, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.145, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1162 (H.B. 2605), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 701 (S.B. 2551), Sec. 3, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 409.022. REFUSAL TO PAY BENEFITS; NOTICE; ADMINISTRATIVE VIOLATION. (a) An insurance carrier's notice of refusal to pay benefits under Section 409.021 must specify the grounds for the refusal.

(b) The grounds for the refusal specified in the notice constitute the only basis for the insurance carrier's defense on the issue of compensability in a subsequent proceeding, unless the defense is based on newly discovered evidence that could not reasonably have been discovered at an earlier date.

(c) An insurance carrier commits an administrative violation if the insurance carrier does not have reasonable grounds for a refusal to pay benefits, as determined by the commissioner.

(d) In this subsection, the terms "custodial officer," "detention officer," "emergency medical technician," "firefighter," and "peace officer" have the meanings assigned by Section 607.051, Government Code. In addition to the other requirements of this section, if an insurance carrier's notice of refusal to pay benefits under Section 409.021 is sent in response to a claim for compensation resulting from a custodial officer's, a detention officer's, an emergency medical technician's, a firefighter's, or a peace officer's disability or death for which a presumption is claimed to be applicable under Subchapter B, Chapter 607, Government Code, the notice must include a statement by the carrier that:

(1) explains why the carrier determined a presumption under that subchapter does not apply to the claim for compensation; and

(2) describes the evidence that the carrier reviewed in making the determination described by Subdivision (1).

(d-1) An insurance carrier has not committed an administrative violation under Section 409.021 if the carrier has sent notice to the employee as required by Subsection (d) of this section or Section 409.021(a-3).

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.146, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 224 (H.B. 1388), Sec. 2, eff. May 29, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 701 (S.B. 2551), Sec. 4, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 993 (S.B. 1582), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 505 (S.B. 22), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2021.

Sec. 409.023. PAYMENT OF BENEFITS; ADMINISTRATIVE VIOLATION. (a) An insurance carrier shall continue to pay benefits promptly as and when the benefits accrue without a final decision, order, or other action of the commissioner, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Benefits shall be paid solely to the order of the employee or the employee's legal beneficiary.

(c) An insurance carrier commits an administrative violation if the insurance carrier fails to comply with this section.

(d) An insurance carrier that commits multiple violations of this section commits an additional administrative violation and is subject to:

(1) the sanctions provided under Section 415.023; and

(2) revocation of the right to do business under the workers' compensation laws of this state.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.147, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.0231. PAYMENT BY ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER. (a) An insurance carrier shall offer employees entitled to the payment of benefits for a period of sufficient duration the option of receiving the payments by electronic funds transfer. The insurance carrier shall provide the necessary forms to an employee who requests that benefits be paid by electronic funds transfer.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules in consultation with the Texas Department of Information Resources as necessary to implement this section, including rules prescribing a period of benefits that is of sufficient duration to allow payment by electronic funds transfer.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 690, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.148, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 409.0232. TIMELINESS OF PAYMENTS. An insurance carrier is considered to have paid benefits in a timely manner if a payment:

(1) is made by electronic funds transfer and is deposited in the employee's account on or before the benefit payment due date;

(2) is made by mail and is mailed in time for the payment to be postmarked on or before the benefit payment due date; or

(3) is to be picked up by the employee and the payment is made available to the employee during regular business hours not later than the opening of business on the benefit payment due date.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 690, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 409.024. TERMINATION OR REDUCTION OF BENEFITS; NOTICE; ADMINISTRATIVE VIOLATION. (a) An insurance carrier shall file with the division a notice of termination or reduction of benefits, including the reasons for the termination or reduction, not later than the 10th day after the date on which benefits are terminated or reduced.

(b) An insurance carrier commits an administrative violation if the insurance carrier does not have reasonable grounds to terminate or reduce benefits, as determined by the commissioner.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 265 (H.B. 7), Sec. 3.149, eff. September 1, 2005.